Utah statutes.
71-3-1.   Use of armories by veterans' organizations permitted.
Any federally chartered veterans' organization shall have the right to the
free use of armories owned or leased by the state; provided that the use does
not interfere with the use of the armories by the national guard or organized
militia of this state.
